Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-125
Simultaneous death; sections not retroactive.

Sections 30-121 to 30-128 shall not apply to the distribution of the property of a person who has died before it takes effect.

Laws 1947, c. 112, § 5, p. 306.